Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 1.4a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1.4a. A. There is hereby created within the Research
Division of the Oklahoma Historical Society the Office of Tribal
Relations. The Office of Tribal Relations shall:
1. Gather, preserve, and maintain all records, documents, and
material related to negotiations and agreements between tribal
governments and the state and political subdivisions;
2. Maintain an archive of all compacts and agreements between
tribal governments and the state and political subdivisions; and
Req. No. 12195 Page 1

3. Organize the compacts, agreements and related documents and
material in a manner on paper or in electronic form that is
accessible to the public.
B. The Office of Tribal Relations is authorized to consult
sources, including, but not limited to, state agencies and tribal
governments, in order to obtain information necessary to fulfill its
duties set forth in subsection A of this section.
C. The Office of Tribal Relations shall deliver an electronic,
updated copy of the material described in paragraph 3 of subsection
A of this section to each member of the Oklahoma Legislature by
December 1 of every even-numbered year. The Office shall deliver a
physical, updated copy of the material described in paragraph 3 of
subsection A of this section to each member of the Oklahoma
Legislature after each gubernatorial election.
D. The Oklahoma Historical Society shall provide suitable
office space for the Office of Tribal Relations.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12195 CMA 01/15/25





Req. No. 12195 Page 2